parSem/xip/dev/GRAMMARS/DUTCH/FST/src/flex-header.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8
!# CONTENT:     country names, capitals and demonyms
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:    DUTCH
!#
!# AUTHOR:      A. Schiller, J. Honnef
!#
!# CREATED:	06-Aug-2007 (AS)
!#
!# ============================================================================

Multichar_Symbols
+Prop +Adj +Noun

+City +Country +Region
+M +F +N +MF		! gender
+Sg +Pl +SgPl		! number
+Gen			! genitive case (Korea's)

+Basic +Decl		! adjective declension
+Abbr			! abbreviation

+NAdj			! adjective or feminine noun	[ Engels, Engelse(n) ]
[-] 			! hyphen or space
(-)			! hyphen or nothing

^+			! morpheme boundary


LEXICON GEN	+Gen:^+s	#;
LEXICON	OptGEN	#; 	GEN;


LEXICON NADJ	NOUNM ; 			! Angolees
		NADJF ;				! Angolees

LEXICON NADJF	+Basic:0	#;		! Amerikaans 
		+Decl:^+e 	#;		! Amerikaanse
		+F+Sg:^+e 	OptGEN;		! Amerikaanse
		+F+Pl:^+en 	OptGEN;		! ?Amerikaansen
		
LEXICON NOUNM	+M+Sg	OptGEN;		! Amerikaan
		+M+Pl:^+en	OptGEN;		! Amerikanen

!# -------------------------------------------------------------------
LEXICON XSG	+MF+Sg:0	OptGEN;
LEXICON XPL	+MF+Pl:0	OptGEN;

LEXICON MSG	+M+Sg:0		OptGEN;
LEXICON FSG	+F+Sg:0		OptGEN;
LEXICON NSG	+N+Sg:0		OptGEN;

LEXICON MPL	+M+Pl:0		OptGEN;
LEXICON FPL	+F+Pl:0		OptGEN;
LEXICON NPL	+N+Pl:0		OptGEN;


LEXICON MSGPL	MSG; MPL;
LEXICON FSGPL	FSG; FPL;
LEXICON NSGPL	NSG; NPL;
